Hawaii statutes.
§353-16.2 Transfer of inmates to
out-of-state institutions. (a) The director may effect the transfer of a
committed felon to any correctional institution located in another state
regardless of whether the state is a member of the Western Interstate Corrections
Compact; provided that the institution is in compliance with appropriate
health, safety, and sanitation codes of the state, provides a level of program
activity for the inmate that is suitable, and is operated by that state, by any
of its political subdivisions, or by a private institution; and provided
further that the transfer is either:

(1) In the interest of the security, management of
the correctional institution where the inmate is presently placed, or the
reduction of prison overcrowding; or

(2) In the interest of the inmate.

(b) Terms and conditions of the transfer and
any reimbursement for expenses shall be agreed upon between the department and
the out-of-state correctional institution prior to transfer. [L 1989, c 42, §1;
am L 1992, c 267, §3; am L 1994, c 208, §2; am L 1995, c 170, §4; am L 1996, c
217, §1]

Cross References

Interstate compact for the supervision of adult offenders,
see chapter 353B.

Interstate corrections compact, see chapter 355D.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next